Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202651-709
Obligations to lender or claimant.

In order to take title pursuant to the Museum Property Act, a museum has the following obligations to a lender or claimant:

(1) The museum shall retain all written records regarding the property for at least twenty-five years after the date of taking title pursuant to the act;

(2) The museum shall keep written records on all loaned property acquired pursuant to section 51-704. Records shall contain the following information:

(a) The lender's name, address, and telephone number;

(b) The claimant's name, address, and telephone number;

(c) The nature and terms of the loan; and

(d) The beginning date of the loan period, if known; and

(3) The museum is responsible for notifying a lender or claimant of the museum's change of address or dissolution.

Laws 1996, LB 1276, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB926, § 4.